Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 34 Prostitution and Lewdness

11-34-1 — 11-34-8.2.
Repealed.

11-34-8.3.
Criminal forfeiture procedures.

Any criminal complaint charging an offense under §§ 11-34-8.1 or 11-34-8.2 shall set forth with reasonable particularity:

Whether the law enforcement agency seeks to have forfeited property pursuant to this section; and

What property the law enforcement agency seeks to have forfeited.

The court may, upon application of the law enforcement agency, enter a restraining order or injunction, require any person claiming any interest in the subject motor vehicle to execute a satisfactory performance bond to the state, or take any other action to preserve the availability of the motor vehicle subject to forfeiture described in § 11-34-8.2 whether prior to or subsequent to the filing of a complaint. Written notice and an opportunity for a hearing shall be afforded to persons appearing to have an interest in the motor vehicle. The hearing is limited to the issues of whether:

There is a substantial probability that the law enforcement agency will prevail on the issue of forfeiture and that failure to enter the order will result in the motor vehicle being destroyed, conveyed, encumbered or further encumbered, removed from the jurisdiction of the court, or otherwise made unavailable for forfeitures; and

The need to preserve the availability of property through the entry of the requested order outweighs the hardship on any party against whom the order is to be entered.

An order under this section may be entered upon application of the law enforcement agency without notice or opportunity for a hearing when a complaint has not yet been filed with respect to the property if the law enforcement agency demonstrates that there is probable cause to believe that the property with respect to which the order is sought would, in the event of conviction, be subject to forfeiture under § 11-34-8.2 and that provision of notice will jeopardize the availability of the motor vehicle for forfeiture. The order shall expire within ten (10) days of the date on which it is entered unless for good cause shown or unless the party against whom it is entered consents to an extension for a longer period.

A hearing requested by any party in interest concerning an order entered under this subsection shall be held at the earliest possible time and prior to the expiration of the temporary order.

The court may receive and consider, at the hearing held pursuant to this subsection, evidence and information that would be inadmissible in court.

Upon conviction of a person for an offense under § 11-34-8.1, the court may enter a judgment of forfeiture of the property described in §§ 11-34-8.2 and

11-34-8.3

to the city or town and shall also authorize the law enforcement agency to seize the motor vehicle ordered forfeited upon any terms and conditions that the court shall deem proper. Following the entry of an order declaring the property forfeited, the court may, upon application of the law enforcement agency, enter any appropriate orders, require the execution of satisfactory performance bonds, appoint receivers, conservators, appraisers, accountants, or trustees, or take any other action to protect the interest of the law enforcement agency in the motor vehicle ordered forfeited.

All right, title, and interest in the motor vehicle described in § 11-34-8.1 vests in the city or town upon the commission of the act giving rise to forfeiture under this section subject to the limitations of § 11-34-8.2. Any such motor vehicle that is subsequently transferred to any person may be the subject of a special verdict of forfeiture and thereafter shall be ordered forfeited to the state, unless the transferee establishes in a hearing that he or she is a bona fide purchaser for value of the motor vehicle who at the time of purchase was reasonably without cause to believe that the motor vehicle was subject for forfeiture.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 8.

11-34-9, 11-34-10.
Repealed.

11-34-11.
Loitering for indecent purposes in or near schools.

Any person who violates this section by attempting to engage a person for the purpose of prostitution or other indecent act, or to patronize or induce or otherwise secure a person to commit any indecent act in the building or on the grounds or within three hundred (300) yards of the grounds of a public or private elementary, vocational, or secondary school, shall be punished by a term of imprisonment of not more than one year and a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 53, § 1.